en: Lithuanian curd cheese
lt: Lietuviškas varškės sūris

en: Polish cheeses, cheeses from Poland
de: Polnischer Käse
fr: Fromages polonais, Fromages de Pologne
hr: Poljski sirevi
lt: Lenkiški sūriai
nl: Poolse kazen
pl: Sery polskie, Sery z Polski

en: Portuguese cheeses, cheeses from Portugual
de: Portugisischer Käse
fr: Fromages portugais, Fromages du Portugal
hr: Portugalski sirevi
lt: Portugališki sūriai
nl: Portugese kazen

en: Romanian cheeses, Cheeses from Romania
fr: Fromages roumains
hr: Rumunjski sirevi
lt: Romaniški sūriai

en: Slovakian cheeses, cheeses from Slovakia
de: Slovakischer Käse
fr: Fromages de Slovaquie, Fromages slovaques
hr: Slovački sirevi
lt: Slovakiški sūriai
nl: Slowaakse kazen

en: Slovenian cheeses, cheeses from Slovenia
de: Slovenischer Käse
fr: Fromages slovènes, Fromages de Slovénie
hr: Slovenskih sireva
nl: Sloveense kazen

en: Pyrénées cheeses, Pyrénées cheeses from ewe's milk
fr: Fromage de brebis des Pyrénées

en: Semi-hard cheeses from ewe's milk, Semi-hard cheeses
fr: Fromage de brebis à pâte pressée

en: Spanish cheeses, cheeses from Spain
de: Spanischer Käse
es: Quesos españoles
fi: Espanjalaiset juustot, juustot Espanjasta
fr: Fromages espagnols, Fromages d'Espagne
hr: Španjolski sirevi
it: Formaggi spagnoli
lt: Ispaniški sūriai
nl: Spaanse kazen
pt: Queijos de Espanha

en: Manchego
xx: Manchego
ca: Manxego
de: Manchego
es: Manchego, queso manchego
fr: Manchego
hr: Manchego
it: Manchego
ja: ケソ・マンチェゴ, マンチェゴ
nl: Manchego
pt: Manchego, queijo manchego

en: Tetilla cheese
de: Queso Tetilla
es: Queso Tetilla, Queixo Tetilla
fi: Queso Tetilla
fr: Queso Tetilla
gl: Queixo de Tetilla
hr: Tetilla sir

en: Brunost
da: myseost
fi: mesjuusto
hr: Brunost
is: mysuostur, mysingur
nb: Brunost, mysost
sv: mesost

en: Swedish cheeses, Cheeses from Sweden
de: Schwedischer Käse
fr: Fromages suédois, Fromages de Suède
hr: Švedski sirevi
lt: Švediški sūriai

en: Gouda Holland
xx: Gouda Holland

bg: Едамер
nl: Noord-Hollandse Edammer

en: Pasteurized cheeses, cheeses made from pasteurized milk, pasteurized cheese, pasteurised cheese
bg: Пастьоризирано сирене
ca: Formatge pasteuritzat, Formatge fet amb llet pasteuritzada
de: Pasteurisierter Käse
es: Quesos pasteurizados, Quesos con leche pasteurizada
fi: Pastöroidut juustot
fr: Fromages pasteurisés, fromages au lait pasteurisé, fromage pasteurisé
he: גבינות מפוסטרות
hr: Pasterizirani sirevi
hu: Pasztőrözött sajt
it: Formaggi pastorizzati
lt: Pasterizuoti sūriai
nl: Gepasteuriseerde kazen
pt: Queijos pasteurizados
ru: Пастеризованные сыры
tr: Pastörize peynir

en: Grated cheese, Shredded cheeses
ca: Formatge ratllat
de: Geriebener Käse
es: Queso rallado
fi: juustoraaste
fr: Fromages râpés, fromage rapé
he: גבינה מגוררת, גבינה מפוררת, גבינה מגורדת
hr: Ribani sir
it: Formaggio grattugiato
ja: 粉チーズ
lt: Tarkuoti sūriai, Tarkuotas sūris
nl: Geraspte kazen
pt: Queijos ralados
ru: Тертый сыр

en: Grated cheeses for fondue
fr: Fromages râpés pour fondue

en: Maroilles
fr: Maroilles, Marolles

en: Maroilles laitier cheese
fr: Maroilles laitier